District of Columbia statutes.
48-903.01

Rules and regulations; fees.

The Mayor may issue rules and regulations and may charge reasonable fees relating to the registration and control of the manufacture, distribution, and dispensing of controlled substances within the District of Columbia.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, title III, § 301, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-531.
Delegation of Authority to implement D.C. Law 4-29, the “District of Columbia Uniformed Controlled Substances Act of 1981”, see Mayor’s Order 98-49, April 15, 1998 ( 45 DCR 2694).